Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1916.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 8117(d.1)(4) of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 8117. Electronic toll collection.* * *(d.1) Notice for posting video toll or flat video toll to customer account.--* * *(4) The commission shall provide for an appeal process[.] that shall provide customers with not less than six months from the posting date of the video toll or flat video toll on the customer's account to file an appeal.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.123456789101112131415161718